Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201285-2233
Legislative intent; Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education; duties; reduction of distribution;
when.

(1)(a)
The Legislature recognizes that education, as an investment in human resources,
is fundamental to the quality of life and the economic prosperity of Nebraskans
and that aid to the community colleges furthers these goals.

(b) It is the
intent of the Legislature that such appropriations reflect the commitment
of the Legislature to join with local governing bodies in a strong and continuing
partnership to further advance the quality, responsiveness, access, and equity
of Nebraska's community colleges and to foster high standards of performance
and service so that every citizen, community, and business will have the opportunity
to receive quality educational programs and services regardless of the size,
wealth, or geographic location of the community college area or tribally controlled
community college by which that citizen, community, or business is served.

(c) In order
to promote quality postsecondary education and to avoid excessive and disproportionate
taxation upon the taxable property of each community college area, the Legislature
may appropriate each biennium from such funds as may be available an amount
for aid and assistance to the community colleges. Such funds so appropriated
by the Legislature shall be allocated, adjusted, and distributed to the community
college boards of governors as provided in the Community College Aid Act.

(2) The Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education shall certify aid amounts attributable
to the allocations pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (3) of section 85-2234
and report such amounts to the Department of Administrative Services. The
commission shall certify such aid amounts on or before September 1 of the
fiscal year for which aid is being certified. The department shall distribute
the total of such appropriated and allocated funds to the boards in ten as
nearly as possible equal monthly payments between the fifth and twentieth
day of each month beginning in September of each year. Any amount transferred
to the Nebraska Community College Student Performance and Occupational Education
Grant Fund pursuant to subdivision (2) of section 85-2234 for a fiscal year
shall be certified and distributed in accordance with sections 85-1539 and
85-1540.

(3) The department shall reduce the amount of the distribution to
a board by the amount of funds used by the community college area to provide
a program or capital construction project as defined in section 85-1402 which
has not been approved or has been disapproved by the Coordinating Commission
for Postsecondary Education pursuant to the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education Act.

Laws 2012, LB946, § 3.
February 14, 2012
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act, see section 85-1401.